tests/data/postgen-overlap.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="utf-8"?>
<dictionary>
  <alphabet/>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="quotes_empty">
      <e><i></i></e>
      <e><i>"</i></e>
    </pardef>
  </pardefs>

  <section id="main" type="standard">

    <e>
      <par n="quotes_empty"/>
      <p>
        <l><a/>detla</l>
        <r>la</r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><a/>a<b/><a/></l>
        <r>a<b/></r>
      </p>
    </e>

  </section>

</dictionary>
